Utah statutes.
76-9-601.   Abuse of a flag.

(1) A person is guilty of abuse of a flag if he:

(a)  Intentionally places any unauthorized inscription or other thing upon any flag of the United States or of any state of the United States; or

(b)  Knowingly exhibits any such flag, knowing the inscription or other thing to be unauthorized; or

(c)  For purposes of advertising a product or service for sale or for distribution, affixes a representation of the flag of the United States or of a state of the United States to the product or on any display whereon the product or service is advertised; or

(d)  Knowingly casts contempt upon the flag of the United States or of any state of the United States by publicly mutilating, defacing, defiling, burning, or trampling upon it.

(2)  Abuse of a flag is a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

